California statutes. Insurance Code
(4) “Religious employer” has the same meaning as described in Section 10123.196.

(c) This section does not alter the applicability of any other requirement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.211.

(a) (1) A health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2025, excluding a specialized health insurance policy, shall provide coverage for emergency room medical care and followup health care treatment for an insured who is treated following a rape or sexual assault, as defined in Sections 261, 261.6, 263, 263.1, 286, 287, and 288.7 of the Penal Code, without imposing cost sharing, including
 copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles, for the first nine months after the enrollee initiates treatment.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “followup health care treatment” includes medical or surgical services for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of medical conditions arising from an instance of rape or sexual assault.

(3) The waiver of the imposition of cost sharing pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only apply if the enrollee’s treating provider submits all requests for claims payments using accurate diagnosis codes specific to rape or sexual assault.

(b) A health insurer shall not require any of the following to provide coverage under this
 section:

(1) An insured to file a police report on the rape or sexual assault.

(2) Charges to be brought against an assailant.

(3) An assailant to be convicted of an offense listed in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) This section does not authorize an insured to receive followup health care treatment required to be covered by this section if treatment is furnished by a nonparticipating provider, except as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) A health insurer shall arrange for the provision of followup health care treatment required by this section from providers outside the insurer’s network if those services are unavailable within the network to ensure timely access to covered health care services consistent with Section 10133.54.

(3) A health insurer shall cover followup health care treatment if those services are for emergency services and care as defined in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) For a health insurance policy that meets the definition of a “high deductible health plan” set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, this section shall only
 apply once an enrollee’s deductible has been satisfied for the year.

(e) “Cost sharing” includes any copayment, coinsurance, or deductible, or any other form of cost sharing paid by the insured other than premium or share of premium.

(f) This section does not apply to specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, or specified disease insurance.

(g) Coverage provided under this section is coverage of sensitive services provided to a protected individual as those terms are defined in Section 791.02 and pursuant to Section 791.29.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 971, Sec. 3.   (AB 2843)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.21.

On or after July 1, 1995, every individual or group policy of disability insurance that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage entered into, amended, or renewed in this state shall, subject to other terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the group or individual policyholder and the insurer, provide coverage for the surgical procedure for those covered conditions directly affecting the upper or lower jawbone, or associated bone joints, if each procedure being considered for reimbursement is deemed medically-necessary by the insurer pursuant to the policy’s definition of medical necessity. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the provision of dental services if dental services are specifically excluded from coverage under the terms and conditions of the contract between the group or individual policyholder and insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1282, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.22.

(a) A health insurer shall not deny coverage that is otherwise available under the health insurance policy for the costs of solid organ or other tissue transplantation services based upon the insured or policyholder being infected with the human immunodeficiency virus.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the provision of benefits required by this section, a health insurer may utilize case management, managed care, or utilization review, subject to the terms and conditions of the policy and consistent with sound clinical processes and guidelines.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10123.21 (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 419, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 370.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10124.

(a) A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than 120 days after the effective date of this section, which provides that coverage of a dependent child of an employee shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy or contract, shall also provide in substance that attainment of the limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of the child while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of an intellectual disability or physical handicap and (2) chiefly dependent upon the employee for support and maintenance, provided proof of the incapacity and dependency is furnished to the employer or employee organization providing the plan or program of benefits by the employee
 within 31 days of the child’s attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the employer or employee organization, but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child’s attainment of the limiting age.

(b) As used in this section, “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” means a plan or program of benefits provided by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for the purpose of providing hospital, medical, surgical, nursing, or dental services, or indemnification for the costs incurred for these services, to the employer’s employees or their dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 138.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10124.7.

Each self-insured employee benefit plan issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section shall provide, where feasible, that benefits for confinement in an extended care facility, as defined in subsection (j) of Section 1395x of Title 42 of the United States Code, may be provided under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the employer and the employee or employee organization.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a self-insured employee benefit plan from providing benefits for confinement in institutions other than extended care facilities as defined in this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10124 (as added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 522) by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

10125.

(a) On and after January 1, 1974, every insurer issuing group disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage for expenses incurred as a result of mental or nervous disorders, under the terms and conditions which may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer. If the terms and conditions include coverage for inpatient care for nervous or mental disorders, the coverage shall extend to treatment provided at all of the following facilities:

(1) A general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) An acute psychiatric hospital as defined in
 subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A psychiatric health facility as defined by Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code operating pursuant to licensure by the State Department of Health Care Services.

Nothing in this subdivision prohibits an insurer that negotiates and enters into a contract with a professional or institutional provider for alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 from restricting or modifying the choice of providers.

(b) Every insurer shall communicate to prospective group policyholders as to the availability of outpatient coverage for the treatment of mental or nervous disorders. Every insurer shall communicate the availability of that coverage to all group policyholders and to all prospective group policyholders with whom they are negotiating. This coverage may include
 community residential treatment services, as described in former Section 5458 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that are alternatives to institutional care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 21.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10125.1.

(a) Every insurer issuing disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that offers coverage for a service that is within the scope of practice of a duly licensed pharmacist shall pay or reimburse the cost of the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the insurer has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.

(b) Payment or reimbursement may be made pursuant to this section for a service performed by a duly licensed pharmacist only when all of the following conditions
 are met:

(1) The service performed is within the lawful scope of practice of the pharmacist.

(2) The coverage otherwise provides reimbursement for identical services performed by other licensed health care providers.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require the insurer to pay a claim to more than one provider for duplicate service or be interpreted to limit physician reimbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10125.2.

(a) A pharmacy benefit manager that contracts with a health insurer shall comply with Article 6.1 (commencing with Section 1385.001) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, including Sections 1385.004 and 1385.006 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A complaint made by an insured that includes potential violations by a pharmacy benefit manager of the terms of Article 6.1 (commencing with Section 1385.001) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code may be considered by the department to be a complaint against the health insurer.

(c) If a health insurer delegates functions to a pharmacy benefit manager, the pharmacy benefits manager shall comply with this code, as applicable. A health insurer shall specify by contract the pharmacy benefits manager’s responsibilities and shall monitor the pharmacy benefit manager to ensure compliance with this code. Notwithstanding delegation pursuant to this subdivision, the health insurer shall remain responsible for compliance with this code.

(d) A contract between a health insurer and a pharmacy benefit manager issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or the date on which the Department of Managed Health Care has established the pharmacy benefit manager licensure process, whichever is later, shall require the pharmacy benefit manager to be licensed and in good standing with the Department of Managed Health Care. A contract term that violates Article 6.1
 (commencing with Section 1385.001) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be void on and after January 1, 2029.

(e) The department may issue guidance regarding implementation of, and compliance with, this section and Sections 10125.2, 10123.2045, and 10123.205. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until January 1, 2030. The department shall consult with stakeholders in developing guidance pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 605, Sec. 17.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.

Every policy of group disability insurance issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1977, which provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits for employees or members and their dependents and which contains provisions granting the employee or member the right to convert the insurance coverage in the event of termination of employment or membership, shall include in such conversion provisions the same conversion rights and conditions to a covered dependent spouse of the employee or member in the event the covered dependent spouse ceases to be a qualified family member by reason of termination of marriage or death of the employee or member. Such conversion rights shall not require a physical examination or a statement of health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1173.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.5.

If a disability insurance policy between an insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and a provider requires that the provider accept, as payment from the insurer, the lowest payment rate charged by the provider to any patient or third party, this policy provision shall not be deemed to apply to, or take into consideration, any cash payments made to the provider by individual patients who do not have any private or public form of health care coverage for the service rendered by the provider, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 657 of the Business and Professions Code. This section shall apply to a provider contract that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 20, Sec. 3.   Effective April 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.6.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage under a health benefit plan, defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, that provides coverage for emergency health care services, that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1999, shall include coverage for emergency medical transportation services, as defined in subdivision (b). This coverage shall be provided without regard to whether the emergency provider has a contractual arrangement with the insurer or whether there was prior authorization, subject to the terms and conditions of the policy.

(b) For purposes of this section, “emergency medical transportation services” means ambulance services provided through the “911” emergency response system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 979, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.61.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2025, shall establish a process to reimburse for services provided by a community paramedicine program, triage to alternate destination program, or mobile integrated health program.

(b) (1) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after
 July 1, 2025, shall require an insured who receives covered services from a noncontracting community paramedicine program, triage to alternate destination program, or mobile integrated health program to pay no more than the same cost-sharing amount that the insured would pay for the same covered services received from a contracting community paramedicine program, triage to alternate destination program, or mobile integrated health program.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, reimbursement rates adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the health insurer’s usual and customary charges for services rendered.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community paramedicine program” means a program defined in Section 1815 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Mobile integrated health program” means a team of licensed health care practitioners, operating within their scope of practice, who provide mobile health services to support the emergency medical services system.

(3) “Triage to alternate
 destination program” means a program defined in Section 1819 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   (SB 1180)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.65.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10352, a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, shall provide that if an insured or subscriber receives covered services from a noncontracting air ambulance provider, the insured or subscriber shall pay no more than the same cost sharing that the insured or subscriber would pay for the same covered services received from a contracting air ambulance provider. This amount shall be referred to as the “in-network cost-sharing amount.”

(2) A subscriber or insured shall not owe the noncontracting provider more than the in-network cost-sharing amount for services subject
 to this section. At the time of payment by the insurer to the noncontracting provider, the insurer shall inform the insured or subscriber and the noncontracting provider of the in-network cost-sharing amount owed by the insured or subscriber.

(b) The following shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) Any cost sharing paid by the insured or subscriber for the services subject to this section shall count toward the limit on annual out-of-pocket expenses established under Section 10112.28.

(2) Cost sharing arising from services subject to this section shall be counted toward any deductible in the same manner as cost sharing would be attributed to a contracting provider.

(3) The cost sharing paid by the insured or subscriber pursuant to this section shall satisfy the insured’s or subscriber’s obligation to pay cost sharing for the health service.

(c) A noncontracting provider may advance to collections only the in-network cost-sharing amount, as determined by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (a), that the insured or subscriber failed to pay.

(d) A health insurer or a provider may seek relief in any court for the purpose of resolving a payment dispute. A provider is not prohibited from using a health insurer’s existing dispute resolution processes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10126.66.

(a) (1) Unless otherwise required by this chapter, a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, shall require an insured who receives covered services from a noncontracting ground ambulance provider to pay no more than the same cost-sharing amount that the insured would pay for the same covered services received from a contracting ground ambulance provider. This amount shall be referred to as the “in-network cost-sharing amount.”

(2) An insured shall not owe the noncontracting ground ambulance provider more than the in-network cost-sharing amount for services subject to this section. At the time of payment by the insurer
 to the noncontracting provider, the insurer shall inform the insured and the noncontracting provider of the in-network cost-sharing amount owed by the insured and shall disclose whether or not the insured’s coverage is regulated by the department or if the coverage is not state-regulated.

(b) (1) The in-network cost-sharing amount paid by the insured pursuant to this section shall count toward the limit on annual out-of-pocket expenses established under Section 10112.28.

(2) Cost sharing arising pursuant to this section shall count toward any deductible in the same manner as cost sharing would be attributed to a contracting provider.

(3) The in-network cost-sharing amount paid by the insured pursuant
 to this section shall satisfy the insured’s obligation to pay cost sharing for the health service.

(c) A noncontracting ground ambulance provider shall only advance to collections the in-network cost-sharing amount, as determined by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (a), that the insured failed to pay.

(1) A noncontracting ground ambulance provider, or an entity acting on its behalf, including a debt buyer or assignee of the debt, shall not do either of the following:

(A) Report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency.

(B) Commence civil action against the insured for a minimum of 12 months after the initial billing regarding amounts
 owed by the insured pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) With respect to an insured, a noncontracting ground ambulance provider, or an entity acting on its behalf, including an assignee of the debt, shall not use wage garnishments or liens on primary residences as a means of collecting unpaid bills pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) Unless otherwise agreed to by the noncontracting ground ambulance provider and the health insurer, the insurer shall directly reimburse a noncontracting ground ambulance provider for ground ambulance services the difference between the in-network cost-sharing amount and an amount described, as follows:

(A) If there is a rate established or approved by a local government, at
 the rate established or approved by the governing body of the local government having jurisdiction for that area or subarea, including an exclusive operating area pursuant to Section 1797.85 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) If the local government having jurisdiction where the service was provided does not have an established or approved rate for that service, the reasonable and customary value for the services rendered, based upon statistically credible information that is updated at least annually and takes into consideration all of the following:

(i) The ambulance provider’s training, qualifications, and length of time in practice.

(ii) The nature of the services provided.

(iii) The fees usually charged by the ambulance provider.

(iv) Prevailing ground ambulance provider rates charged in the general geographic areas in which the services were rendered.

(v) Other aspects of the economics of the ambulance provider’s practice that are relevant.

(vi) Any unusual circumstances in the case.

(2) A local government has jurisdiction over the ground ambulance transport if either of the following applies:

(A) The ground ambulance transport is initiated within the boundaries of the local government’s regulatory jurisdiction.

(B) In the case of ground ambulance transports provided on a mutual or automatic aid basis into another jurisdiction, the local government where the noncontracting ground ambulance provider is based.

(3) A payment made by the health insurer to the noncontracting ground ambulance provider for services as required in subdivision (a), plus the applicable cost sharing owed by the insured, shall constitute payment in full for services rendered.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the amounts paid by a health insurer for services under this section shall not constitute the prevailing or customary charges, the usual fees to the general public, or other charges for other payers for an individual ground ambulance provider.

(e) A health insurer or ground ambulance provider may seek relief in any appropriate court for the purpose of resolving a payment dispute. A ground ambulance provider may use a health insurer’s existing dispute resolution process under Section 10123.137.

(f) This section does not affect the balance billing protections for Medi-Cal beneficiaries under Section 14019.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 520, Sec. 13.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.

On and after January 1, 1974, every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage for expenses incurred as a result of mental or nervous disorders, under the terms and conditions which may be agreed upon between the self-insured welfare benefit plan and the member. If the terms and conditions include coverage for services provided in a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and do not restrict or modify the choice of providers, the coverage shall extend to care provided by a psychiatric health facility, as defined by Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code, operating pursuant to licensure by the State Department of Health Care Services.
 Every plan shall communicate to prospective members as to the availability of outpatient coverage for the treatment of mental or nervous disorders. Every self-insured welfare benefit plan shall communicate the availability of this coverage to all members and prospective members. This coverage may include community residential treatment services, as described in former Section 5458 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that are alternatives to institutional care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 22.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.09.

Notwithstanding any other law, a disability insurance policy that provides hospital, medical, surgical, prescription drug, or nursing benefits, except a policy providing only dental or vision benefits, that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered, on or after January 1, 2024, and that is issued to a bona fide public or private institution of higher learning and provides coverage to its students and their dependents, or to its faculty, staff, administration, and their respective dependents, shall comply with the coverage requirements of Sections 10123.1945 and 10123.196.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 630, Sec. 18.   (SB 523)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.1.

(a) No policy of disability insurance providing loss of time benefits shall contain any provision for a reduction of such benefits during a benefit period because of an increase in benefits payable under the Federal Social Security Act, as amended.

(b) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan providing loss of time benefits shall contain any provision for a reduction of such benefits during a benefit period because of an increase in benefits payable under the Federal Social Security Act, as amended.

(c) This section shall apply to all disability insurance policies issued, delivered, amended, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1977, and shall apply to group disability insurance policies and self-insured employee welfare benefit plans which are entered into, amended, or renewed on or after such date or upon the expiration of any applicable collective-bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.15.

Any provision contained in a policy of disability insurance or a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan for a reduction of loss of time benefits during a benefit period because of an increase in benefits payable under the federal Social Security Act, as amended, shall be null and void with respect to any such increase which occurs on or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.2.

Each policy of disability insurance issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section, which policy provides benefits that accrue after a certain time of confinement in a health care facility, shall specify what constitutes a day of confinement or the number of consecutive hours of confinement which are requisite to the commencement of benefits.

With respect to renewal of individual policies of disability insurance, insurers shall not be required to issue notification to the insured of the provisions of this section unless notice of policy renewal is delivered to the insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.21.

Any data submitted by a health insurer to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, or his or her designee, for purposes of the risk adjustment program described in Section 1343 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18063) shall be concurrently submitted to the department and in the same format. The department shall use the information to monitor federal implementation of risk adjustment in the state and to ensure that insurers are in compliance with federal requirements related to risk adjustment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.3.

On and after January 1, 1985, every insurer issuing group disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage for expenses incurred as a result of treatment by holders of certificates under Section 4938 of the Business and Professions Code, under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer.

An insurer is not required to offer the coverage provided by this section as part of any policy covering employees of a public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1067, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), no contract that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 1999, between a disability insurer that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits and a health care provider shall contain provisions that prohibit, restrict, or limit the health care provider from advertising.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit disability insurers from establishing reasonable guidelines in connection with the activities regulated pursuant to this part, including those to prevent advertising that is, in whole or in part, untrue, misleading, deceptive, or otherwise inconsistent with this part or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. For advertisements mentioning a provider’s participation in a plan or product line of a disability insurer, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit disability insurers from requiring each advertisement to contain a disclaimer to the effect that the provider’s services may be covered for some, but not all, plans or product lines of the disability insurer, or that the disability insurer may cover some, but not all, provider services.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit provisions or agreements intended to protect service marks, trademarks, trade secrets, or other confidential information or property. If a health care provider participates in a provider panel or network as a result of a direct contractual agreement with a disability insurer that, in turn, has entered into a direct contractual agreement with another person or entity, pursuant to which insureds and other beneficiaries of that other person or entity may receive covered services from the health care provider, then nothing in this section is intended to prohibit reasonable provisions or agreements in the direct contractual arrangement between the health care provider and the disability insurer that protect the name or trade name of the other person or entity or requires that the health care provider obtain the consent of the disability insurer prior to the use of the name or trade name of the other person or entity in any advertising by the health care provider.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the authority of the commissioner to regulate advertising, disclosure, or solicitation pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 523, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.5.

Every application for, certificate of, and policy of credit life or credit disability insurance shall set forth a statement in bold capital letters indicating that any preexisting health condition of the applicant may render the coverage void, if that is the case.

For the purpose of this section, “credit life or credit disability insurance” means insurance on the life or health of any borrower sold by any creditor to provide for the repayment of the amount of a loan or other extension of credit in the event of the debtor’s death or disability as defined in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.7.

Every policy of individual life insurance with a face value of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) which is delivered or issued for delivery in this state on and after July 1, 1974, shall have printed thereon or attached thereto a notice stating that, after receipt of the policy by the owner, the policy may be returned by the owner for cancellation by delivering it or mailing it to the insurer or to the agent through whom it was purchased. The period of time set forth by the insurer for return of the policy by the insured shall be clearly stated on the notice and this period shall be not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days. The insured may return the policy to the insurer at any time during the period specified in the notice. This delivery or mailing of the
 policy by the owner shall void the policy from the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy or contract had been issued. All premiums paid and any policy fee paid for the policy shall be refunded to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified that the insured has canceled the policy.

This section applies to all policies issued, amended, or delivered in this state on or after January 1, 2011, and applies to any renewal thereof. All policies subject to this section that are in effect on January 1, 2011, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in such a policy that is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

This section does not apply to individual life insurance policies issued in connection with a credit transaction or issued under a contractual policy change or conversion privilege provision contained in a
 policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.8.

(a) The purpose of this section is to assure truthful and adequate disclosure of all material and relevant information in the advertising of term life insurance which the commissioner, on the basis of an assessment of the total advertisement, determines is directed to individuals 55 years of age or older. 

(b) Advertisements for term life insurance directed to individuals 55 years of age or older shall:

(1) Clearly and prominently distinguish basic life insurance benefits from suppplemental benefits such as accidental death benefits.

(2) Prominently disclose any limitations, exceptions, or reductions affecting each benefit.

(3) Prominently disclose any condition affecting the policy or certificate holder’s continued insurability. If term coverage terminates at a stated age, or at the end of any designated period, that fact and the specified age or designated period shall be disclosed.

(4) Prominently disclose any change in benefits resulting from the aging of the insured, policy duration, or any other factor.

(5) Prominently disclose any change in premium resulting from the aging of the insured, policy duration, or any other factor. If the insurer retains any right to modify premiums in the future, that fact shall be disclosed.

(c) If the benefits of the advertised policy or certificate decrease with the insured’s age or with policy or certificate duration, while the premium remains approximately constant, that fact shall, in a print or broadcast advertisement, be disclosed, in the same form and with prominence or visible duration, or both, equal to that given any positive description of benefits or the telephone number or address provided for further information or application, whichever is the most prominent.

(d) A television or radio advertisement for term life insurance directed to individuals 55 years of age or older shall in the spoken text contain the statement “policy (or certificate) benefits and limitations should be carefully examined prior to purchase.”

(e) The commissioner may, by regulation, adopt a term life insurance monetary value index, similar to the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index of Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 2545) of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, to be disclosed in all advertisements of term life insurance for individuals 55 years of age or older, and on all policies and certificates of that insurance. In developing a term life insurance monetary value index, the commissioner shall consider actual premiums and policy and certificate benefits and the manner in which they are affected with the passage of time. Any term life insurance monetary value index developed pursuant to this section shall assume an insured’s desire to retain coverage for at least 10 years.

(f) This section does not supersede or repeal any regulation of the commissioner which governs life insurance advertising and such regulation shall continue to be in force in addition to this section.

(g) The commissioner shall adopt regulations that are necessary to carry out this section.

(h) This section applies to the advertisement of individual policies of insurance and any group policies or certificates delivered or issued for delivery in this state, regardless of the situs of the contract.

(i) In addition to any other penalty provided by law or the availability of any administrative procedure, if an insurer, after notice and hearing, is found to have violated this section, or regulations adopted pursuant to this section, or knowingly permits any person to do so, the commissioner, in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 704, may suspend the insurer’s certificate of authority to transact life insurance. Section 704.7 shall apply in any proceeding conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1473, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10127.9.

(a) (1) Every individual life insurance policy and every individual annuity contract that is initially delivered or issued for delivery in this state on and after January 1, 1990, shall have printed on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page a notice stating that, after receipt of the policy by the owner, the policy may be returned by the owner for cancellation by mail or other delivery method to the insurer or to the agent through whom it was purchased. The period of time set forth by the insurer for return of the policy by the owner shall be clearly stated and this period shall be not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days.

(2) The owner may return the policy to the insurer by mail or other delivery